dictionaries/tr_TR/tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 12294 N 1
SFX 12294 0 ıtlarına .

SFX 12295 N 1
SFX 12295 0 izdeniz .

SFX 12296 N 1
SFX 12296 0 rtti .

SFX 12297 N 1
SFX 12297 0 itsi .

SFX 12298 N 1
SFX 12298 0 manızdaki .

SFX 12299 N 1
SFX 12299 0 landım .

SFX 12300 N 1
SFX 12300 0 attaki .

SFX 12301 N 1
SFX 12301 0 ülmesiyle .

SFX 12302 N 1
SFX 12302 0 nlarındaki .

SFX 12303 N 1
SFX 12303 0 rtların .

SFX 12304 N 1
SFX 12304 0 dırılmasıdır .

SFX 12305 N 1
SFX 12305 0 tırılabilse .

SFX 12306 N 1
SFX 12306 0 urumun .

SFX 12307 N 1
SFX 12307 0 nlaştıran .

SFX 12308 N 1
SFX 12308 0 izeyiz .

SFX 12309 N 1
SFX 12309 0 mesindense .

SFX 12310 N 1
SFX 12310 0 ğunkinden .

SFX 12311 N 1
SFX 12311 0 evilikte .

SFX 12312 N 1
SFX 12312 0 çılığıydı .

SFX 12313 N 1
SFX 12313 0 kabak .

SFX 12314 N 1
SFX 12314 0 lenemeyeceğini .

SFX 12315 N 1
SFX 12315 0 tçu .

SFX 12316 N 1
SFX 12316 0 amayacakları .

SFX 12317 N 1
SFX 12317 0 ğineydi .

SFX 12318 N 1
SFX 12318 0 kidi .

SFX 12319 N 1
SFX 12319 0 yacaksanız .

SFX 12320 N 1
SFX 12320 0 tırırmış .

SFX 12321 N 1
SFX 12321 0 zımdın .

SFX 12322 N 1
SFX 12322 0 nandır .

SFX 12323 N 1
SFX 12323 0 eleriyle .

SFX 12324 N 1
SFX 12324 0 nıyorsunuz .

SFX 12325 N 1
SFX 12325 0 acaksanız .

SFX 12326 N 1
SFX 12326 0 aştırılabileceğini .

SFX 12327 N 1
SFX 12327 0 sallaştırılan .

SFX 12328 N 1
SFX 12328 0 rikte .

SFX 12329 N 1
SFX 12329 0 nebilmek .

SFX 12330 N 1
SFX 12330 0 icilerine .

SFX 12331 N 1
SFX 12331 0 tırılmayıp .

SFX 12332 N 1
SFX 12332 0 vereceklerdir .

SFX 12333 N 1
SFX 12333 0 nlanmıştı .

SFX 12334 N 1
SFX 12334 0 luymuşum .

SFX 12335 N 1
SFX 12335 0 etmesem .

SFX 12336 N 1
SFX 12336 0 lliliği .

SFX 12337 N 1
SFX 12337 0 ğundu .

SFX 12338 N 1
SFX 12338 0 rleriniz .

SFX 12339 N 1
SFX 12339 0 törsüz .

SFX 12340 N 1
SFX 12340 0 dırıldı .

SFX 12341 N 1
SFX 12341 0 sayın .

SFX 12342 N 1
SFX 12342 0 çüklerin .

SFX 12343 N 1
SFX 12343 0 mizdekiler .

SFX 12344 N 1
SFX 12344 0 ralılık .

SFX 12345 N 1
SFX 12345 0 klemenin .

SFX 12346 N 1
SFX 12346 0 iliğinizle .

SFX 12347 N 1
SFX 12347 0 zleştiler .

SFX 12348 N 1
SFX 12348 0 eseymişim .

SFX 12349 N 1
SFX 12349 0 sıydınız .

SFX 12350 N 1
SFX 12350 0 kopların .

SFX 12351 N 1
SFX 12351 0 ştıkça .

SFX 12352 N 1
SFX 12352 0 tuna .

SFX 12353 N 1
SFX 12353 0 enmeyince .

SFX 12354 N 1
SFX 12354 0 asyonlardır .

SFX 12355 N 1
SFX 12355 0 yışınızı .

SFX 12356 N 1
SFX 12356 0 atlar .

SFX 12357 N 1
SFX 12357 0 şmesen .

SFX 12358 N 1
SFX 12358 0 cimle .

SFX 12359 N 1
SFX 12359 0 vakları .

SFX 12360 N 1
SFX 12360 0 şlerinizi .

SFX 12361 N 1
SFX 12361 0 mazsın .

SFX 12362 N 1
SFX 12362 0 eştirildiğinde .

SFX 12363 N 1
SFX 12363 0 bilmektir .

SFX 12364 N 1
SFX 12364 0 ısıysanız .

SFX 12365 N 1
SFX 12365 0 arlarınız .

SFX 12366 N 1
SFX 12366 0 psın .

SFX 12367 N 1
SFX 12367 0 nlığıma .

SFX 12368 N 1
SFX 12368 0 eşebilirler .

SFX 12369 N 1
SFX 12369 0 andır .

SFX 12370 N 1
SFX 12370 0 ırmamaya .

SFX 12371 N 1
SFX 12371 0 ilenden .

SFX 12372 N 1
SFX 12372 0 adıklarınız .

SFX 12373 N 1
SFX 12373 0 cininde .

SFX 12374 N 1
SFX 12374 0 üncüler .

SFX 12375 N 1
SFX 12375 0 ebilineceği .

SFX 12376 N 1
SFX 12376 0 ğıya .

SFX 12377 N 1
SFX 12377 0 izlikleriyle .

SFX 12378 N 1
SFX 12378 0 üleştiren .

SFX 12379 N 1
SFX 12379 0 diğimi .

SFX 12380 N 1
SFX 12380 0 laşabilirler .

SFX 12381 N 1
SFX 12381 0 kteyse .

SFX 12382 N 1
SFX 12382 0 dırılacaklar .

SFX 12383 N 1
SFX 12383 0 sızlardır .

SFX 12384 N 1
SFX 12384 0 dırıcısı .

SFX 12385 N 1
SFX 12385 0 ığınadır .

SFX 12386 N 1
SFX 12386 0 ımlan .

SFX 12387 N 1
SFX 12387 0 ktım .

SFX 12388 N 1
SFX 12388 0 etleniyor .

SFX 12389 N 1
SFX 12389 0 selleştirmedir .

SFX 12390 N 1
SFX 12390 0 ışına .

SFX 12391 N 1
SFX 12391 0 lmeliymiş .

SFX 12392 N 1
SFX 12392 0 larımızdadır .

SFX 12393 N 1
SFX 12393 0 rırcasına .

SFX 12394 N 1
SFX 12394 0 sısın .

SFX 12395 N 1
SFX 12395 0 rurmuş .

SFX 12396 N 1
SFX 12396 0 tığıma .

SFX 12397 N 1
SFX 12397 0 mekteyim .

SFX 12398 N 1
SFX 12398 0 malıdırlar .

SFX 12399 N 1
SFX 12399 0 ıracağım .

SFX 12400 N 1
SFX 12400 0 kanına .

SFX 12401 N 1
SFX 12401 0 aşıyordun .

SFX 12402 N 1
SFX 12402 0 çlarımızla .

SFX 12403 N 1
SFX 12403 0 ılmamalıyız .

SFX 12404 N 1
SFX 12404 0 iklerimizi .

SFX 12405 N 1
SFX 12405 0 caksındır .

SFX 12406 N 1
SFX 12406 0 tarağı .

SFX 12407 N 1
SFX 12407 0 landırmış .

SFX 12408 N 1
SFX 12408 0 şünde .

SFX 12409 N 1
SFX 12409 0 şımlarını .

SFX 12410 N 1
SFX 12410 0 yemeyince .

SFX 12411 N 1
SFX 12411 0 iyonların .

SFX 12412 N 1
SFX 12412 0 lümüz .

SFX 12413 N 1
SFX 12413 0 ktü .

SFX 12414 N 1
SFX 12414 0 relerinizi .

SFX 12415 N 1
SFX 12415 0 zdasınız .

SFX 12416 N 1
SFX 12416 0 ulmalarını .

SFX 12417 N 1
SFX 12417 0 kılarının .

SFX 12418 N 1
SFX 12418 0 laşamaz .

SFX 12419 N 1
SFX 12419 0 tlarındaki .

SFX 12420 N 1
SFX 12420 0 landırdığına .

SFX 12421 N 1
SFX 12421 0 nüzdeyse .

SFX 12422 N 1
SFX 12422 0 ormuşta .

SFX 12423 N 1
SFX 12423 0 hastalık .

SFX 12424 N 1
SFX 12424 0 mayık .

SFX 12425 N 1
SFX 12425 0 ciği .

SFX 12426 N 1
SFX 12426 0 deyken .

SFX 12427 N 1
SFX 12427 0 silikte .

SFX 12428 N 1
SFX 12428 0 lıklıdır .

SFX 12429 N 1
SFX 12429 0 ancıların .

SFX 12430 N 1
SFX 12430 0 ılardı .

SFX 12431 N 1
SFX 12431 0 lerleydim .

SFX 12432 N 1
SFX 12432 0 ididir .

SFX 12433 N 1
SFX 12433 0 ığındaysa .

SFX 12434 N 1
SFX 12434 0 kladığında .

SFX 12435 N 1
SFX 12435 0 türdü .

SFX 12436 N 1
SFX 12436 0 inlerinizi .

SFX 12437 N 1
SFX 12437 0 ebiliniyormuş .

SFX 12438 N 1
SFX 12438 0 nmediğini .

SFX 12439 N 1
SFX 12439 0 arcılarından .

SFX 12440 N 1
SFX 12440 0 sörler .

SFX 12441 N 1
SFX 12441 0 casınız .

SFX 12442 N 1
SFX 12442 0 ilenlerinde .

SFX 12443 N 1
SFX 12443 0 enimsi .

SFX 12444 N 1
SFX 12444 0 asyonunuzu .

SFX 12445 N 1
SFX 12445 0 eneği .

SFX 12446 N 1
SFX 12446 0 nkilerine .

SFX 12447 N 1
SFX 12447 0 verişidir .

SFX 12448 N 1
SFX 12448 0 çılarınızın .

SFX 12449 N 1
SFX 12449 0 ymişmişmiş .

SFX 12450 N 1
SFX 12450 0 şere .

SFX 12451 N 1
SFX 12451 0 tenli .

SFX 12452 N 1
SFX 12452 0 aşmadığım .

SFX 12453 N 1
SFX 12453 0 leştirilecek .

SFX 12454 N 1
SFX 12454 0 lleştiğini .

SFX 12455 N 1
SFX 12455 0 iten .

SFX 12456 N 1
SFX 12456 0 onları .

SFX 12457 N 1
SFX 12457 0 ızlaşmasını .

SFX 12458 N 1
SFX 12458 0 ramayıp .

SFX 12459 N 1
SFX 12459 0 cektik .

SFX 12460 N 1
SFX 12460 0 labiliriz .

SFX 12461 N 1
SFX 12461 0 ındansanız .

SFX 12462 N 1
SFX 12462 0 rınaydı .

SFX 12463 N 1
SFX 12463 0 keydim .

SFX 12464 N 1
SFX 12464 0 stlikte .

SFX 12465 N 1
SFX 12465 0 idedirler .

SFX 12466 N 1
SFX 12466 0 klarından .

SFX 12467 N 1
SFX 12467 0 falarda .

SFX 12468 N 1
SFX 12468 0 nlüğü .

SFX 12469 N 1
SFX 12469 0 mayacağımız .

SFX 12470 N 1
SFX 12470 0 kanlığı .

SFX 12471 N 1
SFX 12471 0 enişi .

SFX 12472 N 1
SFX 12472 0 emesek .

SFX 12473 N 1
SFX 12473 0 aya .

SFX 12474 N 1
SFX 12474 0 bileceğimi .

SFX 12475 N 1
SFX 12475 0 elimle .

SFX 12476 N 1
SFX 12476 0 landırmadı .

SFX 12477 N 1
SFX 12477 0 şlarınızı .

SFX 12478 N 1
SFX 12478 0 abilirdir .

SFX 12479 N 1
SFX 12479 0 landırsın .

SFX 12480 N 1
SFX 12480 0 nleme .

SFX 12481 N 1
SFX 12481 0 ntının .

SFX 12482 N 1
SFX 12482 0 racaklardı .

SFX 12483 N 1
SFX 12483 0 optu .

SFX 12484 N 1
SFX 12484 0 gelmekte .

SFX 12485 N 1
SFX 12485 0 zliğimle .

SFX 12486 N 1
SFX 12486 0 netini .

SFX 12487 N 1
SFX 12487 0 meseydim .

SFX 12488 N 1
SFX 12488 0 riyorlarmış .

SFX 12489 N 1
SFX 12489 0 sızlarla .

SFX 12490 N 1
SFX 12490 0 sızımdır .

SFX 12491 N 1
SFX 12491 0 lebilirdi .

SFX 12492 N 1
SFX 12492 0 billah .

SFX 12493 N 1
SFX 12493 0 tirmeyin .

SFX 12494 N 1
SFX 12494 0 llığını .

SFX 12495 N 1
SFX 12495 0 şluğundan .

SFX 12496 N 1
SFX 12496 0 emeden .

SFX 12497 N 1
SFX 12497 0 ıracak .

SFX 12498 N 1
SFX 12498 0 dırılmak .

SFX 12499 N 1
SFX 12499 0 ürler .

SFX 12500 N 1
SFX 12500 0 tçısı .

SFX 12501 N 1
SFX 12501 0 ametli .

SFX 12502 N 1
SFX 12502 0 klumu .

SFX 12503 N 1
SFX 12503 0 şlerim .

SFX 12504 N 1
SFX 12504 0 lenebilmekte .

SFX 12505 N 1
SFX 12505 0 dümüzün .

SFX 12506 N 1
SFX 12506 0 şmışmış .

SFX 12507 N 1
SFX 12507 0 mlerimi .

SFX 12508 N 1
SFX 12508 0 luluğu .

SFX 12509 N 1
SFX 12509 0 sızlıklarından .

SFX 12510 N 1
SFX 12510 0 tayızdır .

SFX 12511 N 1
SFX 12511 0 lenmesinden .

SFX 12512 N 1
SFX 12512 0 lılıktan .

SFX 12513 N 1
SFX 12513 0 lıyorsanız .

SFX 12514 N 1
SFX 12514 0 gaları .

SFX 12515 N 1
SFX 12515 0 landılarsa .

SFX 12516 N 1
SFX 12516 0 maktayız .

SFX 12517 N 1
SFX 12517 0 akilerdi .

SFX 12518 N 1
SFX 12518 0 akılar .

SFX 12519 N 1
SFX 12519 0 kilerdeyse .

SFX 12520 N 1
SFX 12520 0 iymişiz .

SFX 12521 N 1
SFX 12521 0 aret .

SFX 12522 N 1
SFX 12522 0 tlana .

SFX 12523 N 1
SFX 12523 0 rağının .

SFX 12524 N 1
SFX 12524 0 ışılar .

SFX 12525 N 1
SFX 12525 0 rodan .

SFX 12526 N 1
SFX 12526 0 bilinseydi .

SFX 12527 N 1
SFX 12527 0 lunuz .

SFX 12528 N 1
SFX 12528 0 leşebilme .

SFX 12529 N 1
SFX 12529 0 ecimle .

SFX 12530 N 1
SFX 12530 0 lleştiriyorum .

SFX 12531 N 1
SFX 12531 0 ıyorduk .

SFX 12532 N 1
SFX 12532 0 şabilirseniz .

SFX 12533 N 1
SFX 12533 0 tıyordur .

SFX 12534 N 1
SFX 12534 0 sılar .

SFX 12535 N 1
SFX 12535 0 anacaksın .

SFX 12536 N 1
SFX 12536 0 ozunun .

SFX 12537 N 1
SFX 12537 0 aklarken .

SFX 12538 N 1
SFX 12538 0 tilmesiydi .

SFX 12539 N 1
SFX 12539 0 oğanın .

SFX 12540 N 1
SFX 12540 0 ilse .

SFX 12541 N 1
SFX 12541 0 zlığınla .

SFX 12542 N 1
SFX 12542 0 uşluğundan .

SFX 12543 N 1
SFX 12543 0 kçimi .

SFX 12544 N 1
SFX 12544 0 çilikle .

SFX 12545 N 1
SFX 12545 0 fadaki .

SFX 12546 N 1
SFX 12546 0 eklenmiş .

SFX 12547 N 1
SFX 12547 0 suydu .

SFX 12548 N 1
SFX 12548 0 iktense .

SFX 12549 N 1
SFX 12549 0 üleriniz .

SFX 12550 N 1
SFX 12550 0 dayız .

SFX 12551 N 1
SFX 12551 0 llaşıp .

SFX 12552 N 1
SFX 12552 0 nimle .

SFX 12553 N 1
SFX 12553 0 imsin .

SFX 12554 N 1
SFX 12554 0 şinizin .

SFX 12555 N 1
SFX 12555 0 lardakini .

SFX 12556 N 1
SFX 12556 0 ğunuzun .

SFX 12557 N 1
SFX 12557 0 tmasalar .

SFX 12558 N 1
SFX 12558 0 lerinedir .

SFX 12559 N 1
SFX 12559 0 elikleriyle .

SFX 12560 N 1
SFX 12560 0 ıyım .

SFX 12561 N 1
SFX 12561 0 eyeceğinize .

SFX 12562 N 1
SFX 12562 0 ozlarda .

SFX 12563 N 1
SFX 12563 0 gene .

SFX 12564 N 1
SFX 12564 0 ndıracağını .

SFX 12565 N 1
SFX 12565 0 takilerine .

SFX 12566 N 1
SFX 12566 0 lmadın .

SFX 12567 N 1
SFX 12567 0 ekiyle .

SFX 12568 N 1
SFX 12568 0 rmezken .

SFX 12569 N 1
SFX 12569 0 enememiş .

SFX 12570 N 1
SFX 12570 0 amışım .

SFX 12571 N 1
SFX 12571 0 ıklısın .

SFX 12572 N 1
SFX 12572 0 yimin .

SFX 12573 N 1
SFX 12573 0 çılardan .

SFX 12574 N 1
SFX 12574 0 kım .

SFX 12575 N 1
SFX 12575 0 elisin .

SFX 12576 N 1
SFX 12576 0 lığımı .

SFX 12577 N 1
SFX 12577 0 cilikleriyle .

SFX 12578 N 1
SFX 12578 0 özlükleri .

SFX 12579 N 1
SFX 12579 0 işliğimin .

SFX 12580 N 1
SFX 12580 0 imdik .

SFX 12581 N 1
SFX 12581 0 tiriciliğini .

SFX 12582 N 1
SFX 12582 0 ştirilmesinden .

SFX 12583 N 1
SFX 12583 0 aklarımla .

SFX 12584 N 1
SFX 12584 0 ındansınız .

SFX 12585 N 1
SFX 12585 0 atınızda .

SFX 12586 N 1
SFX 12586 0 diklerindendir .

SFX 12587 N 1
SFX 12587 0 arınızın .

SFX 12588 N 1
SFX 12588 0 ımdakinden .

SFX 12589 N 1
SFX 12589 0 cıklarımıza .

SFX 12590 N 1
SFX 12590 0 raklarıyla .

SFX 12591 N 1
SFX 12591 0 laştıranlardır .

SFX 12592 N 1
SFX 12592 0 iğiymiş .

SFX 12593 N 1
SFX 12593 0 cikten .

SFX 12594 N 1
SFX 12594 0 ecik .

SFX 12595 N 1
SFX 12595 0 simsin .

SFX 12596 N 1
SFX 12596 0 irmediğimiz .

SFX 12597 N 1
SFX 12597 0 uğumuzdandır .

SFX 12598 N 1
SFX 12598 0 ıksızlık .

SFX 12599 N 1
SFX 12599 0 imiz .

SFX 12600 N 1
SFX 12600 0 mayasıca .

SFX 12601 N 1
SFX 12601 0 ememişizdir .

SFX 12602 N 1
SFX 12602 0 tmayalım .

SFX 12603 N 1
SFX 12603 0 memiz .

SFX 12604 N 1
SFX 12604 0 ne .

SFX 12605 N 1
SFX 12605 0 madıklarından .

SFX 12606 N 1
SFX 12606 0 siyonlara .

SFX 12607 N 1
SFX 12607 0 bında .

SFX 12608 N 1
SFX 12608 0 ğumsun .

SFX 12609 N 1
SFX 12609 0 lleşmesidir .
